zh-CN: 脚踏类型: 搁脚环; 一体式搁脚杆; 无; 可拆卸脚踏板; 其他
ko: 발받침대 유형: 발걸이 링; 일체형 발걸이 바; 없음; 탈착식 발걸이; 기타
vi: Loại chỗ để chân: Vòng để chân; Thanh để chân tích hợp; Không có; Chỗ để chân có thể tháo rời; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta opore za noge: Obroč za noge; Vgrajena palica za naslon nog; Brez; Odstranljiv naslon za noge; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ opierky na nohy: Kruh na nohy; Integrovaná tyč na nohy; Žiadna; Odnímateľná opierka na nohy; Iné
fi: Jalkatuen tyyppi: Jalkarengas; Integroitu jalkatukitanko; Ei mitään; Irrotettava jalkatuki; Muu
ja: フットレストタイプ: フットリング; 一体型フットレストバー; なし; 取り外し可能なフットレスト; その他
ru: Тип подставки для ног: Опорное кольцо; Встроенная перекладина для ног; Отсутствует; Съемная подставка для ног; Другое
pl: Typ podnóżka: Obręcz pod stopy; Zintegrowana listwa pod stopy; Brak; Odłączany podnóżek; Inny
lt-LT: Pakojo tipas: Žiedas pėdoms; Integruotas pėdų atramos strypas; Nėra; Nuimama atrama pėdoms; Kita
fr: Type de repose-pieds: Repose-pieds annulaire; Barre repose-pieds intégrée; Aucun; Repose-pieds amovible; Autre
th: ที่วางเท้า: ที่พักเท้าแบบห่วง; บาร์พักเท้าในตัว; ไม่มี; ที่พักเท้าแบบถอดได้; อื่นๆ
nb: Fotstøttetype: Fotring; Integrert fotstøtte; Ingen; Avtakbar fotstøtte; Annet
de: Typ der Fußstütze: Fußring; Integrierte Fußstützenstange; Keine; Abnehmbare Fußstütze; Sonstiges
nl: Voetsteun type: Voetring; Geïntegreerde voetensteun; Geen; Afneembare voetensteun; Overige
es: Tipo de reposapiés: Aro reposapiés; Barra reposapiés integrada; Ninguno; Reposapiés removible; Otro
tr: Ayak dayama tipi: Ayak halkası; Entegre ayak dayama çubuğu; Yok; Çıkarılabilir ayak dayama yeri; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип поставка за крака: Опора тип пръстен; Интегрирана опора; Няма; Подвижна поставка за крака; Друг
it: Tipo di poggiapiedi: Poggiapiedi ad anello; Barra poggiapiedi integrata; Nessuno; Poggiapiedi rimovibile; Altro
zh-TW: 腳踏類型: 腳踏環; 整合式腳踏桿; 無; 可拆卸腳踏板; 其他
cs: Typ opěrky nohou: Kruhová opěrka; Integrovaná tyčová opěrka; Žádná; Odnímatelná opěrka; Jiná
da: Type af fodstøtte: Fodring; Integreret fodstøtte; Ingen; Aftagelig fodstøtte; Andet
el: Τύπος υποπόδιου: Δακτύλιος ποδιών; Ενσωματωμένη μπάρα ποδιών; Κανένα; Αφαιρούμενο υποπόδιο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de apoio para os pés: Aro para os pés; Barra de apoio de pés integrada; Nenhum; Apoio de pés amovível; Outro
ro-RO: Tip suport pentru picioare: Inel pentru picioare; Bară integrată pentru picioare; Fără; Suport pentru picioare detașabil; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de apoio para os pés: Anel de apoio para os pés; Barra de apoio de pés integrada; Nenhum; Apoio para os pés removível; Outro
hu: Lábtámasz típusa: Lábtartó gyűrű; Beépített lábtartó rúd; Nincs; Eltávolítható lábtartó; Egyéb
sv: Typ av fotstöd: Fotring; Integrerad fotstödsstång; Inget; Avtagbart fotstöd; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta oslonca za noge: Prsten za noge; Ugrađena prečka za noge; Nema; Odvojivi oslonac za noge; Ostalo
en: Footrest type: Foot ring; Integrated footrest bar; None; Removable footrest; Other